Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2907
Financial exploitation; qualified person; notify third party; immunity.

(1) If a qualified person reasonably believes that financial exploitation of an eligible adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or is occurring or being attempted, a qualified person may notify any third party previously designated by the eligible adult or any person allowed to receive notification under applicable law or any customer agreement. Notification may not be made to any designated third party that is suspected of financial exploitation or other abuse of the eligible adult.

(2) Any qualified person that in good faith and exercising reasonable care makes a notification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be immune from administrative or civil liability that might otherwise arise from such notification or for any failure to notify the eligible adult of the disclosure.

Laws 2021, LB297, § 4.